Massachusetts, session 194th, S2132.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after section
15MMMMMM, the following section:-
Section 15NNNNNN. The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting apart
January 30 of each year as Fred Korematsu Day of Civil Liberties and the Constitution, in
recognition of the birthday of Fred Korematsu and to educate about and honor the life of Fred
Korematsu, his perseverance, and his determination to advocate for the civil liberties of all
Americans, and recommending that the day be an opportunity for civic participation and
observed in an appropriate manner by the people.
of 1